Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 97. Mississippi Delta Revitalization Act of 2006

§§ 57-97-1 through 57-97-23.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2006, ch. 444, § 13, effective July 1, 2009.

§57-97-1. [Laws, 2006, ch. 444, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2006.)]

§57-97-3. [Laws, 2006, ch. 444, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2006.)]

§57-97-5. [Laws, 2006, ch. 444, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2006.)]

§57-97-7. [Laws, 2006, ch. 444, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2006.)]

§57-97-9. [Laws, 2006, ch. 444, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2006.)]

§57-97-11. [Laws, 2006, ch. 444, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2006.)]

§57-97-13. [Laws, 2006, ch. 444, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2006.)]

§57-97-15. [Laws, 2006, ch. 444, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2006.)]

§57-97-17. [Laws, 2006, ch. 444, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2006.)]

§57-97-19. [Laws, 2006, ch. 444, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2006.)]

§57-97-21. [Laws, 2006, ch. 444, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2006.)]

§57-97-23. [Laws, 2006, ch. 444, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2006.)]